New York, session 2025-2026, A713.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 502 of the vehicle and traffic law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 3 (c) New traffic related laws. The department shall notify all persons 4 who apply to renew their license of new traffic related laws that went 5 into effect within twelve months of the renewed license. The notifica- 6 tion will be written in a conspicuous manner, in black or blue ink and 7 twelve point font. The department shall notify the person of the new 8 traffic laws by the use of electronic mail or paper form and the notifi- 9 cation may accompany the other renewal documents. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02619-01-5